el: Τύπος κεφαλής βούρτσας καθαρισμού: Βούρτσα γωνιών/άκρων; Σταθερή βούρτσα; Ταλαντευόμενη βούρτσα; Περιστροφικό καθαριστικό επιφανειών; Βούρτσα τροχού; Άλλο
bg-BG: Тип глава на скрубер: Четка за ъгли/ръбове; Фиксирана четка; Въртяща четка; Въртящ се почистващ уред за повърхности; Четка за колела; Друго
fi: Pesupään tyyppi: Kulma-/reunaharja; Kiinteä harja; Värähtelevä harja; Pyörivä pinnanpuhdistin; Pyöräharja; Muu
ro-RO: Tipul capului de frecare: Perie de colț/margine; Perie fixă; Perie oscilantă; Curățător rotativ de suprafață; Perie roată; Altele
ja: スクラバーヘッドの種類: コーナー/エッジブラシ; 固定ブラシ; 振動ブラシ; 回転式表面クリーナー; ホイールブラシ; その他
fr: Type de tête de la brosse: Brosse d’angle / de bord; Brosse fixe; Brosse oscillante; Nettoyeur de surface rotatif; Brosse à roues; Autre
es: Tipo de cabezal del depurador: Cepillo de esquinas/bordes; Pincel fijo; Cepillo oscilante; Limpiador de superficies rotatorio; Cepillo de rueda; Otros
sl-SI: Vrsta čistilne glave: Krtača za vogale/robove; Fiksna krtača; Oscilirajoča krtača; Rotacijski čistilec površin; Krtača za kolesa; Druga
th: ประเภทของหัวขัด: หัวแปรงซอกมุม/ขอบ; หัวแปรงติดตาย; หัวแปรงแบบสั่นแกว่ง; เครื่องทำความสะอาดพื้นผิวแบบหมุน; หัวแปรงแบบล้อหมุน; อื่นๆ
zh-TW: 刷頭類型: 角落刷/邊刷; 固定刷; 擺動刷; 旋轉式表面清潔頭; 車輪刷頭; 其他
de: Bürstenkopftyp: Eck-/Kantenpinsel; Feste Bürste; Oszillierende Bürste; Rotierender Flächenreiniger; Radbürste; Sonstiges
zh-CN: 洗涤器头部类型: 边角刷; 固定刷; 摆动刷; 旋转式表面清洁器; 轮刷; 其他
nl: Type schrobkop: Hoek-/randborstel; Vaste borstel; Oscillerende borstel; Roterende oppervlaktereiniger; Wielborstel; Overig
sk-SK: Typ čistiacej hlavy: Kefa na rohy/okraje; Pevná kefa; Oscilačná kefa; Rotačný čistič povrchov; Kefa na kolesá; Iné
ru: Тип насадки щетки: Щетка для углов/краев; Фиксированная щетка; Вибрирующая щетка; Роторный очиститель поверхностей; Щетка для колес; Другое
pl: Typ głowicy szorującej: Szczotka narożna / krawędziowa; Szczotka stała; Szczotka oscylacyjna; Obrotowy czyścik powierzchni; Szczotka kołowa; Inne
pt-PT: Tipo de cabeça de lavagem: Pincel de canto/borda; Escova fixa; Escova oscilante; Limpador de superfícies rotativo; Escova de roda; Outro
pt-BR: Tipo de cabeça do escovão: Escova para canto/borda; Escova fixa; Escova oscilante; Limpador de superfície rotativo; Escova para rodas; Outro
cs: Typ hlavice kartáče: Kartáč na rohy/okraje; Pevný kartáč; Oscilační kartáč; Rotační čistič povrchů; Kotoučový kartáč; Jiné
en: Scrubber head type: Corner/edge brush; Fixed brush; Oscillating brush; Rotary surface cleaner; Wheel brush; Other
vi: Loại đầu bàn chải chà: Chổi quét góc/cạnh; Chổi cố định; Chổi dao động; Thiết bị làm sạch bề mặt kiểu xoay; Chổi dạng bánh xe; Khác
sv: Skrubberhuvudtyp: Hörn- / kantborste; Fast borste; Oscillerande borste; Roterande ytrengörare; Hjulborste; Annat
it: Tipo di testina di lavaggio: Pennello per angoli/bordi; Spazzola fissa; Spazzola oscillante; Pulitore rotante per superfici; Spazzola per ruote; Altro
nb: Skrubbehodetype: Hjørne-/kantbørste; Fast børste; Oscillerende børste; Roterende overflaterenser; Hjulbørste; Annet
da: Skrubbehoved: Hjørne-/kantbørste; Fast børste; Oscillerende børste; Roterende overfladerenser; Hjulbørste; Andet
hr-HR: Vrsta glave perača: Četka za kutove/rubove; Fiksna četka; Oscilirajuća četka; Rotacijski čistač površina; Četka za kotače; Ostalo
tr: Fırça başlığı tipi: Köşe/kenar fırçası; Sabit fırça; Salınımlı fırça; Döner yüzey temizleme başlığı; Tekerlek fırçası; Diğer
lt-LT: Šveitimo galvutės tipas: Kampinis / kraštinis šepetys; Fiksuotas šepetys; Osciliuojantis šepetys; Rotacinis paviršių valiklis; Ratų šepetys; Kita
hu: Súrolófej típusa: Sarok-/élkefe; Fix kefe; Oszcilláló kefe; Forgó felülettisztító; Kerekes kefe; Egyéb
ko: 스크러버 헤드 유형: 코너/에지 브러시; 고정 브러시; 진동 브러시; 회전식 표면 세척기; 휠 브러시; 기타